New York, session 2025-2026, S8947.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 72-a of the public service law, as added by chapter 2 863 of the laws of 1974, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 72-a. Increased fuel costs. 1. Every gas and electric corporation 4 subject to the jurisdiction of the commission shall file with the 5 commission, on a monthly basis, the following information regarding 6 increased fuel costs: 7 (a) what services are affected by the fuel increase; 8 (b) base cost of the fuel; 9 (c) name and address of supplier; 10 (c-1) if the fuel is sourced from a supplier in Canada, all trans- 11 mission and supply related tariffs; 12 (d) point of delivery of all fuel purchased; 13 (e) present average cost of fuel to said corporation; 14 (f) dates used to determine average; 15 (g) amount per unit of consumption affected; and 16 (h) amount of fuel in storage at the end of each monthly period. 17 (i) and such other relevant information as the commission may require. 18 2. The commission shall publish the information received pursuant to 19 subdivision one of this section on its public website and shall update 20 such information on a monthly basis. 21 § 2. Subdivision 12 of section 66 of the public service law is amended 22 by adding a new paragraph (n) to read as follows: 23 (n) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission shall 24 require a utility which files to increase any rate or charge pursuant to 25 the provisions of this section to provide as part of such filing updated 26 information as specified in subdivision six of this section. The commis- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14197-02-6 S. 8947 2 1 sion shall publish such information on its public website within forty- 2 eight hours of receipt. 3 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 4 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.